Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1447.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1414.1(a), (b), (d) and (f)(1) and (3) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1414.1. Possession and Use of Asthma Inhalers [and], Epinephrine Auto-Injectors and Adrenal Insufficiency Medications.--(a) Each school entity shall develop a written policy to allow for the possession and self-administration by children of school age of asthma inhalers [and], epinephrine auto-injectors and adrenal insufficiency medications, and the prescribed medication to be administered thereby, in a school setting. The policy shall comply with [section 504 of the 123456789101112131415161718192021 Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-112,] 29 U.S.C. § 794 (relating to nondiscrimination under Federal grants and programs) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 15 (relating to protected handicapped students). The policy shall be distributed with the code of student conduct required under 22 Pa. Code § 12.3(c) (relating to school rules) and made available on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website, if any.(b) The policy under this section shall require a child of school age that desires to possess and self-administer an asthma inhaler [or], epinephrine auto-injector or adrenal insufficiency medication in a school setting to demonstrate the capability for self-administration and for responsible behavior in the use thereof and to notify the school nurse immediately following each use of an asthma inhaler [or], epinephrine auto-injector or adrenal insufficiency medication. The school entity shall develop a system whereby the child may demonstrate competency to the school nurse that the child is capable of self-administration and has permission for carrying and taking the medication through the use of the asthma inhaler [or], epinephrine auto-injector or adrenal insufficiency medication. Determination of competency for self-administration shall be based on age, cognitive function, maturity and demonstration of responsible behavior. The school entity shall also restrict the availability of the asthma inhaler, the epinephrine auto-injector, the adrenal insufficiency medication and the prescribed medication contained therein from other children of school age. The policy shall specify conditions under which a student may lose the privilege to self-carry the asthma inhaler, the epinephrine auto-injector, the adrenal insufficiency medication and the medication if the school policies are abused 20250HB1447PN1692 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or ignored. A school entity that prevents a student from self-carrying an asthma inhaler [or], epinephrine auto-injector or adrenal insufficiency medication and the prescribed medication shall ensure that they are appropriately stored at locations in close proximity to the student prohibited from self-carrying and notify the student's classroom teachers of the places where the asthma inhaler [or], epinephrine auto-injector or adrenal insufficiency medication and medication are to be stored and the means to access them.* * *(d) [As used in this section, "school entity"] For purposes of this section:"Adrenal insufficiency medication" means a medication that treats adrenal insufficiency."School entity" means a school district, intermediate unit, charter school or area career and technical school.* * *(f) Within one hundred twenty (120) days of the effective date of this subsection, the Department of Health in coordination with the Department of Education shall provide technical assistance and resources and publish information on the Department of Health's publicly accessible Internet website regarding the administration of medication for allergies and adrenal insufficiency by persons employed by a school entity, including the following:(1) Proper use and administration of epinephrine devices and adrenal insufficiency medications.* * *(3) Recognition of the symptoms of a severe allergic reaction or adrenal crisis.20250HB1447PN1692 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1414.13. School Administration of Adrenal Insufficiency Medication.--(a) A school entity or nonpublic school may authorize a trained school employe to administer to a student an adrenal insufficiency medication that the student's parent or legal guardian has provided to the school employe trained under subsection (c) for the school entity or nonpublic school if the trained school employe believes in good faith that the student is having an adrenal crisis.(b) A school entity or nonpublic school that authorizes the administration of adrenal insufficiency medication under this section shall designate one or more school employes at each school who shall be responsible for the storage and use of the adrenal insufficiency medication.(c) School employes who are responsible for the storage and use of adrenal insufficiency medication must successfully complete a training program that shall be developed and implemented by the Department of Health within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this subsection.(d) The student's adrenal insufficiency medication provided to the school entity or nonpublic school by the student's parent or legal guardian for storage may be utilized in either of the following ways:(1) Provided to a student by the trained school employe and utilized by a student authorized to self-administer.(2) Administered to a student by the trained school employe authorized to administer adrenal insufficiency medication under subsection (a).(e) In the event a student is believed to be having an 20250HB1447PN1692 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adrenal crisis, the school nurse or school employe trained under subsection (c) shall contact local emergency services as soon as possible.(f) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 8332 (relating to emergency response provider and bystander good Samaritan civil immunity) and 8337.1 (relating to civil immunity of school officers or employees relating to emergency care, first aid and rescue) shall apply to a person authorized under this section to administer an adrenal insufficiency medication.(g) Administration of an adrenal insufficiency medication under this section shall comply with 29 U.S.C. § 794 (relating to nondiscrimination under Federal grants and programs) and 22 Pa. Code Ch. 15 (relating to protected handicapped students).(h) For purposes of this section:"Adrenal crisis" means a sudden, severe worsening of symptoms associated with adrenal insufficiency, such as severe pain in the lower back, abdomen or legs, vomiting, diarrhea, dehydration, low blood pressure or loss of consciousness."Adrenal insufficiency" means a hormonal disorder that occurs when the adrenal glands do not produce enough adrenal hormones."Adrenal insufficiency medication" means a medication that treats adrenal insufficiency."Nonpublic school" shall have the same meaning as defined in section 1502-M."School entity" means a school district, intermediate unit, charter school, cyber charter school, regional charter school or area career and technical school.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1447PN1692 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728